Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 66
COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES - PURCHASE

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of part 2 of article 1 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

27-66-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 66, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

(1.3) "Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

(1.5) "Behavioral health entity" has the same meaning as defined in section 27-50-101.

(1.7) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration.

to (6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 701, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

IP, (1), IP(2), (3), and (6) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1349, § 245, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1.5) added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3642, § 14, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), and (3) repealed and (1.5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1583, § 213, effective July 1; (1.3) and (1.7) added and (4), (5), and (6) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1542, § 125, effective July 1; (1.5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 864, § 117, effective July 1.

27-66-102. Administration - rules.

The commissioner has the power and duty to administer and enforce the provisions of this article 66.

The state board of human services may adopt reasonable and proper rules to implement this article 66 in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-103 and consistent with sections 27-90-102 and 27-90-103.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 702, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1542, § 126, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-1-202 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-66-103. Community mental health services - purchase program.

In order to encourage the development of preventive, treatment, and rehabilitative services through new community mental health programs, the improvement and expansion of existing community mental health services, and the integration of community with state mental health services, there is established a program to purchase community mental health services by the BHA.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 702, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1542, § 127, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-1-203 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For provisions on community-centered boards that provide services for persons with developmental disabilities, see part 1 of article 10.5 of this title 27.

27-66-104. Types of services purchased - limitation on payments.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2024.]

Community mental health services may be purchased from behavioral health entities, clinics, community mental health centers, local general or psychiatric hospitals, and other agencies that have been approved by the commissioner.

Each year the general assembly shall appropriate money for the purchase of mental health services from:

Community mental health centers;

Agencies that provide specialized clinic-type services but do not serve a specific designated service area;

Acute treatment units; and

Behavioral health entities.

The money appropriated for the purposes of this subsection (2) shall be distributed by the commissioner to approved behavioral health entities, community mental health centers, and other agencies on the basis of need and in accordance with the services provided.

Each year the general assembly may appropriate money in addition to the money appropriated for purposes of subsection (2) of this section, which money may be used by the commissioner to assist behavioral health entities and community mental health clinics and centers in instituting innovative programs, in providing mental health services to impoverished areas, and in dealing with crisis situations. The commissioner shall require that any innovative or crisis programs for which money is allocated pursuant to this subsection (3) be clearly defined in terms of services to be rendered, program objectives, scope and duration of the program, and the maximum amount of money to be provided.

Repealed.

If there is a reduction in the financial support of local governmental bodies for community mental health services, the commissioner is authorized to reduce state payments for services in an amount proportional to the reduction in such local financial support.

For purposes of entering into a cooperative purchasing agreement pursuant to section 24-110-201, a nonprofit behavioral health entity, nonprofit community mental health center, or nonprofit community mental health clinic may be certified as a local public procurement unit as provided in section 24-110-207.5.

27-66-104. Types of services purchased - limitation on payments.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Community mental health services may be purchased from behavioral health safety-net providers that have been approved by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 702, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 11-225), ch. 189, p. 731, § 5, effective May 19.

L. 2012:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 12-1247), ch. 53, p. 197, § 8, effective March 22.

L. 2013:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 13-1181), ch. 74, p. 241, § 9, effective March 22.

L. 2016:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 471, § 23, effective May 4; (4)(b) repealed, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 472, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (SB 17-264), ch. 353, p. 1839, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(1), IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(II), (2)(a)(III), (2)(b), (3), and (6) amended and (2)(a)(IV) added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3642, § 15, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1), (2)(b), (3), and (5) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1542, § 128, effective July 1; Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1587, § 215, effective July 1, 2024.

27-66-105. Standards for approval - repeal.

In approving or rejecting community mental health clinics for the purchase of behavioral or mental health services, the commissioner shall:

Consider the adequacy and quality of mental health services provided by such clinics, taking into consideration such factors as geographic location, local economic conditions, and availability of manpower;

Require that overall responsibility for the administration of a community mental health clinic be vested in a director who is a physician or a member of one of the mental health professions;

Require that the treatment programs of the clinic be under the overall direction of a psychiatrist who is a physician licensed to practice medicine in the state of Colorado;

Require that the clinic staff include, wherever feasible, other professional staff workers, such as psychologists, social workers, educational consultants, and nurses, with such qualifications, responsibilities, and time on the job as correspond with the size and capacity of the clinic. The clinic staff may include, with the approval of the commissioner, such other nonprofessional persons as may be deemed necessary by the clinic board for the proper discharge of its functions.

Require that each clinic from which services may be purchased be under the control and direction of a county or community board of health, a board of directors or trustees of a corporation, for profit or not for profit, a regional mental health board, or a political subdivision of the state;

Consider the existence of facilities that provide an emphasis on the care and treatment of persons recently released from hospitals or facilities directed toward assisting persons with behavioral or mental health disorders in their adjustment to and functioning within society as a whole;

Repealed.

In approving or rejecting local general or psychiatric hospitals, behavioral health entities, community mental health centers, acute treatment units, and other agencies for the purchase of services not provided by local mental health clinics, including, but not limited to, twenty-four-hour and partial hospitalization, the commissioner shall consider the following factors:

The general quality of care provided to patients by such agencies;

The organization of the medical staff to provide for the integration and coordination of the psychiatric treatment program;

The provisions for the availability of nursing, psychological, and social services and the existence of an organized program of activities under the direction of an occupational therapist or of another qualified person;

The licensure by the department of public health and environment or another state agency where applicable;

The methods by which the agency coordinates its services with those rendered by other agencies to ensure an uninterrupted continuum of care to persons with behavioral or mental health disorders; and

The availability of such services to the general public.

In the purchase of services from behavioral health entities or community mental health centers, the commissioner shall specify levels and types of inpatient, outpatient, consultation, education, and training services and expenditures and shall establish minimum standards for other programs of such centers that are to be supported with state funds.

In approving or rejecting behavioral health entities, community mental health clinics, community mental health centers, acute treatment units, local general or psychiatric hospitals, and other agencies for the purchase of services, the commissioner shall ensure the agencies comply with federal financial participation requirements for BHA-administered programs.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 704, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(f), and (2)(e) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1350, § 246, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(1)(e) amended, (SB 18-096), ch. 44, p. 475, § 19, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(a), IP(2), and (3) amended and (1)(g) and (4) added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3643, § 16, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (1)(d), IP(2), (3), and (4) amended, (1)(g) repealed, and (5) added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1543, § 129, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-1-205 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-096, see section 1 of chapter 44, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

27-66-106. Federal grants-in-aid and other grants for mental health and integrated behavioral health services - administration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 705, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-096), ch. 44, p. 475, § 20, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3638, § 4, effective August 2; entire section amended, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3643, § 17, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1544, § 130, effective July 1.

27-66-107. Purchase of services by courts, counties, municipalities, school districts, and other political subdivisions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 705, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1287), ch. 175, p. 2015, § 2, effective May 14; entire section amended, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3644, § 18, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1544, § 130, effective July 1.

27-66-108. Institutes and training programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 705, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1544, § 130, effective July 1.

27-66-109. Family mental health services grant program - rural areas - creation - administration - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 705, § 2, effective April 29.

27-66-110. Trauma-informed care standards of approval.

The BHA shall establish care standards and an approval process that a qualified residential treatment program, as defined in section 26-6-903 (26), must meet to ensure that qualified residential treatment programs have a trauma-informed treatment model that addresses the needs of children and youth with serious emotional or behavioral health disorders or disturbances.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1308), ch. 256, p. 2462, § 12, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1544, § 131, effective July 1; Entire section amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 864, § 118, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by HB 22-1278 and HB 22-1295 were harmonized.